Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.020

Supplemental principles of law.

(1) Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

(2) If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in RCW 19.52.010(1).

[ 1998 c 103 s 104.]